tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Çim ve Bahçe > Bahçecilik > Bahçe Aletleri > Çiçek Ekme Aletleri: Bitki Soğanı Dikme Burguları; Bitki Soğanı Dikme Aracı; Fide Kazıkları; Kazıcılar
pl: Dom i ogród > Trawnik i ogród > Ogrodnictwo > Narzędzia ogrodnicze > Narzędzia do sadzenia cebulek: Świdry do cebulek; Sadzarki do cebulek; Dibblery; Kopacze
th: บ้านและสวน > สนามและสวน > การทำสวน > เครื่องมือทำสวน > เครื่องมือปลูกต้นไม้: ดอกเจาะดินสำหรับปลูกหัวพืช; เครื่องปลูกพืชหัว; เครื่องปลูก; พลั่วขุด
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Travnik in vrt > Vrtnarjenje > Vrtno orodje > Orodja za sajenje čebulic: Svedri za čebulice; Sadilniki za čebulice; Tulci za sajenje; Pripomočki za kopanje
cs: Dům a zahrada > Trávníky a zahrady > Zahradničení > Zahradnické nářadí > Kolíky na sázení cibulek: Šrouby na cibuloviny; Sázecí zařízení na cibuloviny; Sázecí kolíky; Motyčky/trojzubce
it: Casa e giardino > Prato e giardino > Giardinaggio > Attrezzi da giardinaggio > Strumenti per piantare bulbi: Trivelle a bulbo; Piantatrici di bulbi; Cavicchi; Scavatori
es: Casa y jardín > Jardín > Jardinería > Herramientas de jardín > Herramientas para plantar bulbos: Ahoyadores para bulbos; Plantadores de bulbos; Díblers; Excavadores
da: Hjem og have > Græsplæne og have > Havearbejde > Haveredskaber > Planteredskaber til planteløg: Havebor; Løgplantningsredskaber; Dibblere; Gravere
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Trávnik a záhrada > Záhradníctvo > Záhradné náradie > Nástroje na pestovanie cibuľovín: Vrtáky na výsadbu cibuľovín; Sadzače cibuľovín; Sádzače cibuľovín; Presádzacie lopaty
fr: Maison et jardin > Pelouses et jardins > Jardinage > Outils de jardinage > Outils de plantation: Tarières à bulbe; Planteurs à bulbes; Planteurs; Creuseurs
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Veja ir sodas > Sodininkystė > Sodo įrankiai > Svogūnėlių sodinimo įrankiai: Sraigtinis grąžtas svogūnėliams sodinti; Svogūnėlių sodinimo įrankiai; Smaigai daigams sodinti; Kasimo priemonės
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > ガーデン用品・ガーデン機器 > ガーデニング > ガーデニング用具 > 球根植え器: バルブオーガー; バルブプランター; ディブラー; ディガー
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Relva e jardim > Jardinagem > Ferramentas de jardinagem > Ferramentas para plantar bolbos: Brocas para bolbos; Plantadores de bolbos; Ferramentas Dibbler; Charruas
en: Home & Garden > Lawn & Garden > Gardening > Gardening Tools > Bulb Planting Tools: Bulb Augers; Bulb Planters; Dibblers; Diggers
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Gazon și grădină > Articole pentru grădinărit > Scule de grădinărit > Plantator de bulbi: Burghie pentru plantarea bulbilor; Plantatoare de bulbi; Scule pentru plantat; Scule pentru săpat
vi: Nhà và vườn > Bãi cỏ và vườn > Làm vườn > Dụng cụ làm vườn > Xẻng lấy đất: Mũi khoan hố trồng cây thân củ; Dụng cụ trồng cây thân củ; Dụng cụ đào lỗ tra hạt; Dụng cụ đào lỗ
de: Heim & Garten > Rasen & Garten > Gartenarbeit > Gartenwerkzeuge > Geräte zum Pflanzen von Knollen: Kugelbohrer; Blumenzwiebelpflanzer; Pflanzholz; Grabewerkzeuge
nb: Hjem og hage > Plen og hage > Hagearbeid > Hageverktøy > Verktøy for løkplanting: Bor til løkplanting; Løkplantere; Dibblere; Hagegraver
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Piha ja puutarha > Puutarhanhoito > Puutarhatyökalut > Istutuskairat: Sipulien istutusporat; Sipulien istutuslaitteet; Istutustikut; Kaivuutyökalut
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Морава и градина > Градинарство > Градински инструменти > Инструменти за засаждане на луковици: Свредла за засаждане на луковици; Саксии за луковици; Колове за разсад; Копачи
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 잔디/정원 > 원예 > 원예 도구 > 구근 파종 도구: 구근 오거; 구근 식재기; 이식기; 호미
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Gramado e jardim > Jardinagem > Ferramentas de jardinagem > Ferramentas para plantio de bulbos: Brocas para plantio de bulbos; Plantadores de bulbos; Dibbers; Escavadoras
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 草坪与花园 > 园艺用品 > 园艺工具 > 球茎种植工具: 球茎螺旋钻; 球茎种植器; 点播机; 挖土机
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 草皮和花園 > 園藝 > 園藝工具 > 挖坑栽種工具: 球根種植鑽頭; 球根種植器; 種子分配器; 播種器
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Travnjak i vrt > Vrtlarstvo > Vrtlarski alati > Alati za sadnju lukovica: Svrdlo za bušenje rupa za sadnice; Sadilice za lukovice; Klinovi za sadnju; Kopači
ru: Дом и сад > Товары для придомовых и садовых участков > Садоводство > Садовые инструменты > Инструменты для посадки луковиц: Шнеки для луковиц; Горшки для луковиц; Лункообразователи; Посадочные конусы
hu: Otthon és kert > Gyep és kert > Kertészkedés > Kertészeti eszközök > Hagymaültetési eszközök: Hagymafúrók; Hagymaültetők; Ültetőrudak; Ásók
nl: Huis en tuin > Tuin en gazon > Tuinieren > Tuingereedschap > Bollenplanters: Bollenboren; Bloembollenplanters; Dibblers; Gravers
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Γκαζόν & κήπος > Κηπουρική > Εργαλεία κηπουρικής > Εργαλεία φύτευσης βολβών: Τρυπάνια φύτευσης βολβών; Φυτευτές βολβών; Σκαλιστήρια; Σκαπτικά
sv: Hem och trädgård > Gräsmatta och trädgård > Trädgårdsskötsel > Trädgårdsverktyg > Lökplanteringsverktyg: Lökplanteringsborrar; Lökplanterare; Planteringsverktyg; Grävare